tests/verbs-TAD.yaml
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 19) tv.aa.dir p2.sg":
    payaxkh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kpayaxkho
    payaxkh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kpayaxkhaok
    pahkaskinkweh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kpahkaskinkweho
    pahkaskinkweh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kpahkaskinkwehaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 20) tv.aa.dir p2.sg":
    poxin<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kpoxina
    poxin<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kpoxinaok
    keshinal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : keshinala
    keshinal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : keshinalaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 19) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    payaxkh<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : payaxkho #had an additional "o" at coda, may be error
    payaxkh<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : payaxkhaok
    pahkaskinkweh<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : pahkaskinkwehao
    pahkaskinkweh<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : pahkaskinkwehaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 20) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    poxin<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : poxinao
    poxin<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : poxinaok
    keshinal<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : keshinalao
    keshinal<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : keshinalaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 19) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    payaxkh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nihelawena 
    payaxkh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nihelawenanak 
    pahkaskinkweh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : mpahkaskinkwehawena
    pahkaskinkweh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : mpahkaskinkwehawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 20) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    poxin<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : mpoxinawena
    poxin<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : mpoxinawenanak
    keshinal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nkeshinalawena
    keshinal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nkeshinalawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 19) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    payaxkh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kpayaxkhawena
    payaxkh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kpayaxkhawenanak
    pahkaskinkweh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kpahkaskinkwehawena
    pahkaskinkweh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kpahkaskinkwehawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 20) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    poxin<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kpoxinawena
    poxin<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kpoxinawenanak
    keshinal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : keshinalawena
    keshinal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : keshinalawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 19) tv.aa.dir p2.pl":
    payaxkh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kpayaxkhawa
    payaxkh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kpayaxkhawaok
    pahkaskinkweh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kpahkaskinkwehawa
    pahkaskinkweh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kpahkaskinkwehawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 20) tv.aa.dir p2.pl":
    poxin<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kpoxinawa
    poxin<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kpoxinawaok
    keshinal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : keshinalawa
    keshinal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : keshinalawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 19) tv.aa.dir p3.pl":
    payaxkh<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : payaxhawoo
    pahkaskinkweh<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : pahkaskinkwehawoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 20) tv.aa.dir p3.pl":
    poxin<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : poxinawoo
    keshinal<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : keshinalawoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 21) tv.aa.dir p1.sg": 
    tun<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : ntuna
    tun<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : ntunaok
    kishih<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : nkishiha
    kishih<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : nkishihaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 22) tv.aa.dir p1.sg": 
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : nkiskha
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : nkiskhaok
    muh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : nemuha
    muh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : nemuhaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 21) tv.aa.dir p2.sg":
    tun<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : ktuna
    tun<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : ktunaok
    kishih<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kishiha
    kishih<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kishihaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 22) tv.aa.dir p2.sg":
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kiskha
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kiskhaok
    muh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kemuha
    muh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kemuhaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 21) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    tun<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : tunao
    tun<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : tunaok
    kishih<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : kishihao
    kishih<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : kishihaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 22) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : kiskhao
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : kiskhaok
    muh<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : muhao
    muh<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : muhaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 21) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    tun<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : ntunawena
    tun<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : ntunawenanak
    kishih<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nkishihawena
    kishih<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nkishihawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 22) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nkiskhawena
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nkiskhawenanak
    muh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nemuhawena
    muh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nemuhawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 21) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    tun<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : ktunawena
    tun<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : ktunawenanak
    kishih<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kishihawena
    kishih<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kishihawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 22) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kiskhawena
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kiskhawenanak
    muh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kemuhawena
    muh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kemuhawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 21) tv.aa.dir p2.pl":
    tun<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : ktunawa
    tun<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : ktunawaok
    kishih<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kishihawa
    kishih<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kishihawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 22) tv.aa.dir p2.pl":
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kiskhawa
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kiskhawaok
    muh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kemuhawa
    muh<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kemuhawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 21) tv.aa.dir p3.pl":
    tun<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : tunawoo
    kishih<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : kishihawoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 22) tv.aa.dir p3.pl":
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : kiskhawoo
    muh<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : muhawoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 23) tv.aa.dir p1.sg": 
    ulin<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : nulina
    ulin<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : nulinaok
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : nkekhitahola
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : nkekhitaholaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 24) tv.aa.dir p1.sg": 
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : nkeshewipxkonena
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : nkeshewipxkonenaok
    naxal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : naxala
    naxal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : naxalaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 23) tv.aa.dir p2.sg":
    ulin<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kulina
    ulin<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kulinaok
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : kekhitahola
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : kekhitaholaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 24) tv.aa.dir p2.sg":
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : keshewipxkonena
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : keshewipxkonenaok
    naxal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_sg> : knaxala
    naxal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><sg><o_pl> : knaxalaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 23) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    ulin<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : welinao #"ulinao" in ()
    ulin<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : welinaok #"ulinaok" in ()
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : kekhitaholao
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : kekhitaholaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 24) tv.aa.dir p3.sg":
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : keshewipxkonenao
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : keshewipxkonenaok
    naxal<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_sg> : naxalao
    naxal<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><sg><o_pl> : naxalaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 23) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    ulin<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nulinawena
    ulin<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nulinawenanak
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nkekhitaholawena
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nkekhitaholawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 23) tv.aa.dir p1.excl.pl":
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : nkeshewipxkonenawena
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : nkeshewipxkonenawenanak
    naxal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_sg> : naxalawena
    naxal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><excl><pl><o_pl> : naxalawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 23) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    ulin<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kulinawena
    ulin<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kulinawenanak
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : kekhitaholawena
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : kekhitaholawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 24) tv.aa.dir p1.incl.pl":
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : keshewipxkonenawena
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : keshewipxkonenawenanak
    naxal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_sg> : knaxalawena
    naxal<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><incl><pl><o_pl> : knaxalawenanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 23) tv.aa.dir p2.pl":
    ulin<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kulinawa
    ulin<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kulinawaok
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : kekhitaholawa
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : kekhitaholawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 24) tv.aa.dir p2.pl":
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : keshewipxkonenawa
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_ok> : keshewipxkonenawaok
    naxal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_sg> : knaxalawa
    naxal<v><tv><aa><dir><p2><pl><o_pl> : knaxalawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 23) tv.aa.dir p3.pl":
    ulin<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : welinawoo #"ulinawoo" in ()
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : kekhitaholawoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 24) tv.aa.dir p3.pl":
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : keshewipxkonenawoo
    naxal<v><tv><aa><dir><p3><pl> : naxalawoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 25) tv.aa.dir p1.sg": 
    nusum<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : nusuma
    nusum<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : nusumaok
    lankum<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : ntelankuma
    lankum<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : ntelankumaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 26) tv.aa.dir p1.sg": 
    winkwichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : newinkwichema
    winkwichem<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : newinkwichemaok
    peh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_sg> : mpeha
    peh<v><tv><aa><dir><p1><sg><o_pl> : mpehaok
